Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2905
Physicians association; qualified to become member; when.

Any physician, licensed to practice medicine in Nebraska, shall be qualified to become a member of a physicians association incorporated under sections 44-2901 to 44-2918 upon acceptance of his application for membership by the association in accordance with the rules and bylaws.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 5.